ja: ARTセキュリティ評価: 1つ星; 2つ星; 3つ星; 4つ星; 5つ星; 非認証; その他
bg-BG: ART оценка за сигурност: 1 звезда; 2 звезди; 3 звезди; 4 звезди; 5 звезди; Без сертификат; Друго
hr-HR: ART sigurnosna ocjena: 1 zvjezdica; 2 zvjezdice; 3 zvjezdice; 4 zvjezdice; 5 zvjezdica; Nema certifikat; Ostalo
pt-PT: Classificação de segurança ART: 1 estrela; 2 estrelas; 3 estrelas; 4 estrelas; 5 estrelas; Não certificado; Outros
nl: ART-beveiligingsclassificatie: 1 ster; 2 sterren; 3 sterren; 4 sterren; 5 sterren; Niet gecertificeerd; Overige
it: Valutazione di sicurezza ART: 1 stella; 2 stelle; 3 stelle; 4 stelle; 5 stelle; Non certificato; Altro
hu: ART biztonsági besorolás: 1 csillag; 2 csillag; 3 csillag; 4 csillag; 5 csillag; Nincs tanúsítva; Egyéb
th: ระดับการรักษาความปลอดภัย ART: 1 ดาว; 2 ดาว; 3 ดาว; 4 ดาว; 5 ดาว; ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง; อื่นๆ
pl: Klasa bezpieczeństwa ART: 1 gwiazdka; 2 gwiazdki; 3 gwiazdki; 4 gwiazdki; 5 gwiazdek; Brak certyfikatu; Inne
en: ART security rating: 1 star; 2 stars; 3 stars; 4 stars; 5 stars; Not certified; Other
ru: Рейтинг безопасности ART: 1 звезда; 2 звезды; 3 звезды; 4 звезды; 5 звезд; Без сертификации; Другое
zh-TW: ART 安全評級: 1 顆星; 2 顆星; 3 顆星; 4 顆星; 5 顆星; 未認證; 其他
fi: ART-turvallisuusluokitus: 1 tähti; 2 tähteä; 3 tähteä; 4 tähteä; 5 tähteä; Ei sertifioitu; Muu
ko: ART 보안 등급: 별 1개; 별 2개; 별 3개; 별 4개; 별 5개; 인증되지 않음; 기타
es: Clasificación de seguridad ART: 1 estrella; 2 estrellas; 3 estrellas; 4 estrellas; 5 estrellas; No certificada; Otra
sl-SI: Varnostna ocena ART: 1 zvezdica; 2 zvezdici; 3 zvezdice; 4 zvezdice; 5 zvezdic; Ni certificirano; Drugo
tr: ART güvenlik derecelendirmesi: 1 yıldız; 2 yıldız; 3 yıldız; 4 yıldız; 5 yıldız; Sertifikasız; Diğer
ro-RO: Evaluarea securității ART: 1 stea; 2 stele; 3 stele; 4 stele; 5 stele; Necertificat; Altele
vi: Xếp hạng bảo mật ART: 1 sao; 2 sao; 3 sao; 4 sao; 5 sao; Chưa được chứng nhận; Khác
nb: ART-sikkerhetsvurdering: 1 stjerne; 2 stjerner; 3 stjerner; 4 stjerner; 5 stjerner; Ikke sertifisert; Annet
de: ART-Sicherheitsbewertung: 1 Stern; 2 Sterne; 3 Sterne; 4 Sterne; 5 Sterne; Nicht zertifiziert; Sonstige
zh-CN: ART 安全等级: 1 星; 2 星; 3 星; 4 星; 5 星; 未认证; 其他
sv: ART-säkerhetsklassificering: 1 stjärna; 2 stjärnor; 3 stjärnor; 4 stjärnor; 5 stjärnor; Ej certifierad; Annat
cs: Úroveň bezpečnostní certifikace ART: 1 hvězdička; 2 hvězdičky; 3 hvězdičky; 4 hvězdičky; 5 hvězdiček; Bez certifikace; Ostatní
el: Βαθμολογία ασφαλείας ART: 1 αστέρι; 2 αστέρια; 3 αστέρια; 4 αστέρια; 5 αστέρια; Μη πιστοποιημένο; Άλλο
fr: Niveau de sécurité ART: 1 étoile; 2 étoiles; 3 étoiles; 4 étoiles; 5 étoiles; Non certifié; Autre
lt-LT: ART saugumo įvertinimas: 1 žvaigždutė; 2 žvaigždutės; 3 žvaigždutės; 4 žvaigždutės; 5 žvaigždutės; Nesertifikuota; Kita
sk-SK: Hodnotenie bezpečnosti ART: 1 hviezdička; 2 hviezdičky; 3 hviezdičky; 4 hviezdičky; 5 hviezdičiek; Necertifikované; Iné
pt-BR: Classificação de segurança ART: 1 estrela; 2 estrelas; 3 estrelas; 4 estrelas; 5 estrelas; Não certificado; Outro
da: ART-sikkerhedsvurdering: 1 stjerne; 2 stjerner; 3 stjerner; 4 stjerner; 5 stjerner; Ikke certificeret; Andet